Utah statutes.
70A-7a-404.   No liability for good-faith delivery pursuant to document of title.

A bailee that in good faith has received goods and delivered or otherwise disposed of the goods according to the terms of a document of title or pursuant to this chapter is not liable for the goods even if:

(1)  the person from which the bailee received the goods did not have authority to procure the document or to dispose of the goods; or

(2)  the person to which the bailee delivered the goods did not have authority to receive the goods.



Enacted by Chapter 42, 2006 General Session

